Washington statutes.
RCW 36.05.020

Noninterested judge to sit.

A suit to establish county boundary lines shall be tried before a judge of the superior court who is not a resident of a county which is a party to such suit, or of a judicial district embracing any such county.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.05.020. Prior: 1897 c 76 s 2; RRS s 3965.]